test/src/morphology/myv-test-V-kundams_all_gt-norm.yaml
  Verb - кундамс: # Verb1 "to catch"
     кундамс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill: кундамс
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Ill+Px1Sg: кундамозон
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Ill+Px2Sg: кундамозот
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Ill+Px3Sg: кундамозонзо
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Ill+Px1Pl: кундамозонок
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Ill+Px2Pl: кундамозонк
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Ill+Px3Pl: кундамозост
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Loc: кундамо
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Loc+Px1Sg: кундамон
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Loc+Px2Sg: кундамот
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Loc+Px3Sg: кундамонзо
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Loc+Px1Pl: кундамонок
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Loc+Px2Pl: кундамонк
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Loc+Px3Pl: кундамост
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмА+N+Abl+Sg+Indef: кундамодо
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмА+N+Abl+Sg+Px1Sg: кундамодон
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмА+N+Abl+Sg+Px2Sg: кундамодот
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмА+N+Abl+Sg+Px3Sg: кундамодонзо
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмА+N+Abl+Sg+Px1Pl: кундамодонок
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмА+N+Abl+Sg+Px2Pl: кундамодонк
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмА+N+Abl+Sg+Px3Pl: кундамодост
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмА+N+Abl+Pl+Indef: кундамодо
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмА+N+Abl+Pl+Px1Sg: кундамодон
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмА+N+Abl+Pl+Px2Sg: кундамодот
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмА+N+Abl+Pl+Px3Sg: кундамодонзо
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмА+N+Abl+Pl+Px1Pl: кундамодонок
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмА+N+Abl+Pl+Px2Pl: кундамодонк
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмА+N+Abl+Pl+Px3Pl: кундамодост
     кундамс+V+Der/Омга+Inf+Prl: кундамга
     кундамс+V+Der/Омга+Inf+Prl+Px1Sg: кундамган
     кундамс+V+Der/Омга+Inf+Prl+Px2Sg: кундамгат
     кундамс+V+Der/Омга+Inf+Prl+Px3Sg: кундамганзо
     кундамс+V+Der/Омга+Inf+Prl+Px1Pl: кундамганок
     кундамс+V+Der/Омга+Inf+Prl+Px2Pl: кундамганк
     кундамс+V+Der/Омга+Inf+Prl+Px3Pl: кундамгаст
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмстО+Inf+Ela: кундамсто
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмстО+Inf+Ela+Px1Sg: кундамстон
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмстО+Inf+Ela+Px2Sg: кундамстот
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмстО+Inf+Ela+Px3Sg: кундамстонзо
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмстО+Inf+Ela+Px1Pl: кундамстонок
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмстО+Inf+Ela+Px2Pl: кундамстонк
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмстО+Inf+Ela+Px3Pl: кундамстост
     кундамс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Ind+NonPast+ScSg1: кундамсан
     кундамс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Ind+NonPast+ScSg2: кундамсат
     кундамс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3: кундамс
     кундамс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1: кундамстано
     кундамс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2: кундамстадо
     кундамс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3: кундамс
     кундамс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1: кундамсолинь
     кундамс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2: кундамсолить
     кундамс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3: кундамсоль
     кундамс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1: кундамсолинек
     кундамс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2: кундамсолиде
     кундамс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3: кундамсольть
     кундамс+V+Der/Ома+Oblig+Ind+NonPast+ScSg1: кундаман
     кундамс+V+Der/Ома+Oblig+Ind+NonPast+ScSg2: кундамат
     кундамс+V+Der/Ома+Oblig+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3: кундама
     кундамс+V+Der/Ома+Oblig+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1: кундаматано
     кундамс+V+Der/Ома+Oblig+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2: кундаматадо
     кундамс+V+Der/Ома+Oblig+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3: кундамат
     кундамс+V+Der/Ома+Oblig+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1: кундамалинь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ома+Oblig+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2: кундамалить
     кундамс+V+Der/Ома+Oblig+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3: кундамаль
     кундамс+V+Der/Ома+Oblig+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1: кундамалинек
     кундамс+V+Der/Ома+Oblig+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2: кундамалиде
     кундамс+V+Der/Ома+Oblig+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3: кундамальть
     кундамс+V+Der/Озь+Ger: кундазь
     кундамс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+Ind+NonPast+ScSg1: кундазян
     кундамс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+Ind+NonPast+ScSg2: кундазят
     кундамс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3: кундазь
     кундамс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1: кундазтяно
     кундамс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2: кундазтядо
     кундамс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3: кундазть
     кундамс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1: кундазелинь
     кундамс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2: кундазелить
     кундамс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3: кундазель
     кундамс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1: кундазелинек
     кундамс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2: кундазелиде
     кундамс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3: кундазельть
     кундамс+V+Der/Онь+VGen: кундань
     кундамс+V+Der/Овт+TelicN+N+Nom+Sg+Indef: кундавт
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмА+N+Nom+Sg+Indef: кундамо
     кундамс+V+Der/Ы+ActPtcShort+A: кунды
     кундамс+V+Der/Ы+ActPtcShort+Der/кс+A: кундыкс
     кундамс+V+Der/Ый+ActPtcLong+A: кундый
     кундамс+V+Der/Ыця+ActDemPtc+A: кундыця
     кундамс+V+ConNeg: кунда
     кундамс+V+Imprt+ScSg2: кундак
     кундамс+V+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg3: кундык
     кундамс+V+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg1: кундамак
     кундамс+V+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl3: кундыть
     кундамс+V+Imprt+ScPl2: кундадо
     кундамс+V+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg3: кундынк
     кундамс+V+Imprt+ScPl2+OcPl3: кундынк
     кундамс+V+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl1: кундамизь
     кундамс+V+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg1: кундамизь
     кундамс+V+Imprt+ScPl2+OcPl1: кундамизь
     кундамс+V+Imprt+ScSg3+OcPl1: кундамизь
     кундамс+V+Imprt+ScPl3+OcSg1: кундамизь
     кундамс+V+Imprt+ScPl3+OcPl1: кундамизь
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScSg1: кундазан
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScSg2: кундазат
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScSg3: кундасо
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScPl1: кундазтано
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScPl2: кундазтадо
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScPl3: кундаст
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScSg1+OcSg3: кундазса
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScSg2+OcSg3: кундазсак
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScSg3+OcSg3: кундазсо
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScSg1+OcPl3: кундазсынь
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScSg2+OcPl3: кундазсыть
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScSg3+OcPl3: кундазсынзе
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScPl1+OcSg3: кундазсынек
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScPl1+OcPl3: кундазсынек
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScPl2+OcSg3: кундазсынк
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScPl2+OcPl3: кундазсынк
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScPl3+OcSg3: кундазсызь
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScPl3+OcPl3: кундазсызь
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScSg1+OcSg2: кундазтан
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScSg3+OcSg2: кунданзат
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScSg1+OcPl2: кундаздызь
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScPl1+OcSg2: кундаздызь
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScPl1+OcPl2: кундаздызь
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScSg3+OcPl2: кундаздызь
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScPl3+OcSg2: кундаздызь
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScPl3+OcPl2: кундаздызь
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScSg2+OcSg1: кундазмак
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScSg3+OcSg1: кундазмам
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScSg2+OcPl1: кундазмизь
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScPl2+OcSg1: кундазмизь
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScPl2+OcPl1: кундазмизь
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScSg3+OcPl1: кундазмизь
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScPl3+OcSg1: кундазмизь
     кундамс+V+Opt+ScPl3+OcPl1: кундазмизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg1: кундан
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg2: кундат
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3: кунды
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1: кундатано
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2: кундатадо
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3: кундыть
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg1+OcSg3: кундаса
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg2+OcSg3: кундасак
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3+OcSg3: кундасы
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg1+OcPl3: кундасынь
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg2+OcPl3: кундасыть
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3+OcPl3: кундасынзе
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1+OcSg3: кундасынек
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1+OcPl3: кундасынек
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2+OcSg3: кундасынк
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2+OcPl3: кундасынк
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3+OcSg3: кундасызь
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3+OcPl3: кундасызь
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg1+OcSg2: кундатан
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3+OcSg2: кундатанзат
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg1+OcPl2: кундатадызь
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1+OcSg2: кундатадызь
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1+OcPl2: кундатадызь
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3+OcPl2: кундатадызь
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3+OcSg2: кундатадызь
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3+OcPl2: кундатадызь
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg2+OcSg1: кундасамак
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3+OcSg1: кундасамам
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg2+OcPl1: кундасамизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2+OcSg1: кундасамизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2+OcPl1: кундасамизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3+OcPl1: кундасамизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3+OcSg1: кундасамизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3+OcPl1: кундасамизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: кундынь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: кундыть
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: кундась
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: кундынек
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: кундынк
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: кундасть
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: кундыя
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: кундык
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: кундызе
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: кундынь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: кундыть
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: кундынзе
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: кундынек
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: кундынек
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: кундынк
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: кундынк
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: кундызь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: кундызь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg2: кундытинь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg2: кундынзеть
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl2: кундыдизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg2: кундыдизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl2: кундыдизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl2: кундыдизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg2: кундыдизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl2: кундыдизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg1: кундымик
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg1: кундымим
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl1: кундымизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg1: кундымизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl1: кундымизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl1: кундымизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg1: кундымизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl1: кундымизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1: кундылинь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2: кундылить
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3: кундыль
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1: кундылинек
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2: кундылиде
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3: кундыльть
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg3: кундылия
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg3: кундылик
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg3: кундылизе
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl3: кундылинь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl3: кундылить
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl3: кундылинзе
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg3: кундылинек
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl3: кундылинек
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg3: кундылинк
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl3: кундылинк
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg3: кундылизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl3: кундылизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg2: кундылитинь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg2: кундылинзеть
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl2: кундылидизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg2: кундылидизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl2: кундылидизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl2: кундылидизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg2: кундылидизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl2: кундылидизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg1: кундылимик
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg1: кундылимим
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl1: кундылимизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg1: кундылимизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl1: кундылимизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl1: кундылимизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg1: кундылимизь
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl1: кундылимизь
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg1: кундавлинь
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg2: кундавлить
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg3: кундаволь
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl1: кундавлинек
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl2: кундавлиде
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl3: кундавольть
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg3: кундавлия
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg3: кундавлик
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg3: кундавлизе
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl3: кундавлинь
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl3: кундавлить
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl3: кундавлинзе
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg3: кундавлинек
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl3: кундавлинек
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg3: кундавлинк
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl3: кундавлинк
